New York, session 2025-2026, A5306.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (b) and (d) of subdivision 12-a of section 375 2 of the vehicle and traffic law, paragraph (b) as amended and paragraph 3 (d) as added by chapter 155 of the laws of 1991, are amended to read as 4 follows: 5 (b) No person shall operate any motor vehicle upon any public highway, 6 road or street: 7 (1) the front windshield of which is composed of, covered by or treat- 8 ed with any material which has a light transmittance of less than seven- 9 ty percent unless such materials are limited to the uppermost six inches 10 of the windshield; or 11 (2) the sidewings or side windows of which on either side forward of 12 or adjacent to the operator's seat are composed of, covered by or treat- 13 ed with any material which has a light transmittance of less than 14 [seventy] fifty percent; or 15 (3) if it is classified as a station wagon, sedan, hardtop, coupe, 16 hatchback or convertible and any rear side window has a light transmit- 17 tance of less than [seventy] fifty percent; or 18 (4) the rear window of which is composed of, covered by or treated 19 with any material which has a light transmittance of less than [seventy] 20 fifty percent. [A rear window may have a light transmittance of less 21 than seventy percent if the vehicle is equipped with side mirrors on 22 both sides of the vehicle so adjusted that the driver thereof shall have 23 a clear and full view of the road and condition of traffic behind such 24 vehicle.] EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08000-02-5 A. 5306 2 1 (d) The commissioner may test any window for a person who has been 2 charged with violating this subdivision. Such measurements made by the 3 commissioner, or their designee, shall be given a tolerance of plus or 4 minus seven percent. If such window is found to be in conformity with 5 this subdivision, a small label attesting to the conformity shall be 6 affixed to the window tested. 7 § 2. Subparagraph (a) of paragraph 1 of subdivision (c) of section 301 8 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 444 of the laws of 9 2016, is amended to read as follows: 10 (a) A safety inspection shall be made with respect to the brakes; 11 steering mechanism; wheel alignment; lights, including but not limited 12 to the lights which are designed and placed on a vehicle for the purpose 13 of illuminating the vehicle's license plates; odometer; tire pressure; 14 seat safety belts; shoulder harness safety belts; [any window which is] 15 windows to determine whether they are composed of, covered by or treated 16 with any material which has a light transmittance [of less than seventy 17 percent] in violation of the percentages established pursuant to section 18 three hundred seventy-five of this title and such other mechanisms and 19 equipment as shall be determined by the commissioner to be necessary for 20 proper and safe operations. Such inspection shall also be made with 21 respect to vehicle identification number. Upon inspection, the mileage 22 appearing on the odometer shall be recorded upon the inspection sticker. 23 § 3. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 24 have become a law. Effective immediately the addition, amendment and/or 25 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 26 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 27 on or before such effective date.